Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 9 VEHICLE EQUIPMENT
§ 49-925. Lighting equipment on motor-driven cycles.

The head lamp upon every motor-driven cycle may be of the single-beam or multiple-beam type, but in either event shall comply with the requirements and limitations as follows:

Every head lamp on a motor-driven cycle shall be of sufficient intensity to reveal a person or a vehicle at a distance of not less than one hundred (100) feet when the motor-driven cycle is operated at any speed less than twenty-five (25) miles per hour and at a distance of not less than two hundred (200) feet when the motor-driven cycle is operated at a speed of twenty-five (25) or more miles per hour, and at a distance of three hundred (300) feet when the motor-driven cycle is operated at a speed of thirty-five (35) miles or more per hour.

In the event a motor-driven cycle is equipped with multiple-beam head lamps, the beams shall meet the minimum requirements set forth above and shall not exceed the limitations set forth in section 49-922, Idaho Code.

In the event a motor-driven cycle is equipped with a single-beam lamp, the lamp shall be so aimed that when the vehicle is loaded, none of the high-intensity portion of light, at a distance of twenty-five (25) feet ahead, shall project higher than the level of the center of the lamp from which it comes.

§ 49-926. Alternate road-lighting equipment.

Any motor vehicle may be operated under the conditions specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code, when equipped with two (2) lighted lamps upon the front capable of revealing persons and objects seventy-five (75) feet ahead in lieu of lamps required in section 49-922 or section 49-924, Idaho Code. At no time shall it be operated at a speed in excess of twenty (20) miles per hour.

§ 49-927. Number of driving lamps required or permitted.

At all times specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code, at least two (2) lighted lamps shall be displayed, one (1) on each side at the front of every motor vehicle other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, except when the vehicle is parked subject to the requirements governing lights on parked vehicles.

Whenever a motor vehicle equipped with required head lamps is also equipped with any auxiliary lamps, a spot lamp, or any other lamp on the front projecting a beam of intensity greater than three hundred (300) candlepower, not more than a total of four (4) lamps on the front of a vehicle shall be lighted at any one (1) time when upon a highway.

§ 49-928. Special restrictions on lamps.

Any lighted lamp or illuminating device upon a motor vehicle, other than head lamps, spot lamps, auxiliary lamps, or flashing turn signals, emergency vehicle warning lamps, and school bus warning lamps, which projects a beam of light of an intensity greater than three hundred (300) candlepower shall be so directed that no part of the high-intensity portion of the beam will strike the level of the roadway on which the vehicle stands at a distance of more than seventy-five (75) feet from the vehicle.

No person shall drive or move any vehicle or equipment upon any highway with any lamp or device displaying a red light visible from directly in front of the center of the vehicle or equipment. This section shall not apply to any vehicle upon which a red light visible from the front is expressly authorized or required by this title.

As a practical means of determining whether head lamps or auxiliary driving or fog lamps glare the following test shall apply: Any such lamp shall be deemed to be glaring if any part of the main beam strikes the body of a person, vehicle, screen or other object higher than the lamp centers twenty-five (25) feet or more ahead of the vehicle and in no event shall the main bright portion of the beam be higher than forty-two (42) inches at a distance of seventy-five (75) feet ahead of the vehicle.

Flashing lights are prohibited except on an authorized emergency vehicle, school bus, snow removal equipment, or on any vehicle as a means for indicating a right or left turn, or the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring unusual care in approaching, overtaking or passing.

§ 49-929. Lights on snow removal equipment.

It shall be unlawful to operate any snow removal equipment on any highway unless lamps on the equipment comply with and are lighted when and as required by the standards and specifications adopted by the director of the Idaho transportation department.

§ 49-930. Selling or using lamps or equipment.

No person shall have for sale, sell, or offer for sale for use upon or as a part of the equipment of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, or use upon any vehicle any head lamp, auxiliary or fog lamp, rear lamp, or reflector which reflector is required in this chapter, or parts of any of the foregoing which tend to change the original design or performance, unless of a type which has been submitted to the director and approved by him, and which bears the trademark or name under which it is approved so as to be legible when installed.

No person shall use upon any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer any lamps mentioned in this section unless the lamps are mounted, adjusted and aimed in accordance with instructions of the department.

§ 49-931, 49-932. [Reserved.]

Every motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, when operated upon a highway shall be equipped with brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop and hold the vehicle, including two (2) separate means of applying the brakes, each of which means shall be effective to apply the brakes to at least two (2) wheels. If the two (2) separate means of applying the brakes are connected in any way, they shall be so constructed that failure of any one (1) part of the operating mechanism shall not leave the motor vehicle without brakes on at least two (2) wheels.

Every motorcycle and every motor-driven cycle, when operated upon a highway, shall be equipped with at least one (1) brake, which may be operated by hand or foot.

Every trailer or semitrailer of an unladen weight of one thousand five hundred (1,500) pounds or more when operated upon a highway shall be equipped with brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop and hold the vehicle and be designed to be applied by the driver of the towing motor vehicle from its cab. The brakes shall be designed and so connected that in case of an accidental breakaway of the towed vehicle, the brakes shall be automatically applied.

Every new motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer sold in this state and operated upon the highways shall be equipped with service brakes upon all wheels of the vehicle, except that any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, trucks and truck tractors having three (3) or more axles need not have brakes on the front wheels. Vehicles equipped with at least two (2) steerable axles need not be equipped with brakes on the wheels of one (1) axle, and any trailer or semitrailer of less than one thousand five hundred (1,500) pounds unladen weight need not be equipped with brakes. Every farm trailer while being used hauling agricultural products from farm to storage, marketing or processing plant, or returning therefrom, and used within a radius of fifty (50) miles, shall be exempt from these braking requirements.

One (1) of the means of brake operation shall consist of a mechanical connection from the operating lever, or by equivalent means to the brake shoes or bands, and this brake shall be capable of holding the vehicle, or combination of vehicles, stationary under any condition of loading on any upgrade or downgrade upon which it is operated.

Brake shoes operating within or upon the drums on the vehicle wheels of any motor vehicle may be used for both service and hand operation.

Every motor vehicle or combination of vehicles, at all times and under all conditions of loading, shall, upon application of the service (foot) brake, be capable of decelerating and developing a braking force equivalent to minimum required deceleration, and stopping within the requirements set forth in this subsection:

All brakes shall be maintained in good working order and shall be adjusted to operate as equally as practicable with respect to the wheels on opposite sides of the vehicle.

Passenger vehicles, not including buses

25

17

53.0%

Single-unit vehicles with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of less than 10,000 pounds

30

14

43.5%

Single-unit, 2-axle vehicles with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 or more pounds

40

14

43.5%

All other vehicles and combinations with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 or more pounds

50

14

43.5%

Compliance with these standards shall be determined either by actual road tests conducted on a substantially level, not to exceed a plus or minus one per cent (1%) grade, dry, smooth, hard-surfaced road that is free from loose material, with stopping distances measured from the actual instant braking controls are moved and from an initial speed of twenty (20) miles per hour; or else by suitable mechanical tests in a testing lane which recreates the same conditions; or by a combination of both methods.

§ 49-934. Brakes on motor-driven cycles.

The director is authorized to require an inspection of the brake on any motor-driven cycle and to disapprove any brake which he finds will not comply with the performance standard set forth in section 49-933, Idaho Code, or which in his opinion is not so designed or constructed as to insure reasonable and reliable performance in actual use.

The director may request the department to refuse registration for, or suspend or revoke the registration of any vehicle referred to in this section when he determines that the brake on the vehicle does not comply with the provisions of this section.

No person shall operate on any highway any vehicle referred to in this section in the event the director has disapproved the brake equipment upon that vehicle or type of vehicle.

§ 49-935, 49-936. [Reserved.]

Every motor vehicle shall at all times be equipped with a muffler in good working order and in constant operation to prevent excessive or unusual noise and annoying smoke, and no person shall use a muffler cut-out, bypass, or similar device upon a motor vehicle on a highway. When any motor vehicle was originally equipped with a noise suppressing system or when any motor vehicle is required by law or regulation of this state or the federal government to have a noise suppressing system, that system shall be maintained in good working order. No person shall disconnect any part of that system except temporarily in order to make repairs, replacements or adjustments, and no person shall modify or alter that system or its operation in any manner, except to conform to the manufacturer’s specifications. No person shall knowingly operate and no owner shall knowingly cause or permit to be operated any motor vehicle originally equipped or required by any law or regulation of the state or the federal government to be equipped with a noise suppressing system while any part of that system is disconnected or while that system or its operation is modified or altered in any manner, except to conform to the manufacturer’s specifications.

The engine and power mechanism of every motor vehicle shall be so equipped and adjusted as to prevent the escape of excessive fumes or smoke.

No person shall modify the exhaust system of a motor vehicle or a motorcycle in a manner which will amplify or increase the noise of the vehicle or motorcycle above that emitted by the muffler originally installed on the vehicle by the manufacturer.

A showing that the sound made by a passenger motor vehicle or motorcycle exceeds the maximum allowable decibel level shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of subsection (1) of this section.

No person shall sell, offer for sale, or install any noise suppressing system or device which will produce excessive or unusual noise.

§ 49-938, 49-939. [Reserved.]

§ 49-940. Mirrors.

Every motor vehicle shall be equipped with a mirror so located as to reflect to the operator a view of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred (200) feet to the rear of the vehicle.

When a motor vehicle is so loaded or constructed, or is towing a vehicle or trailer which is so loaded or constructed, as to obstruct the driver’s view straight to the rear, then the motor vehicle shall be equipped with a mirror on the left side and a mirror on the right side so located as to reflect to the operator a view of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred (200) feet to the rear of the vehicle.

When an operator of a motor vehicle is transporting under special permit authority an oversize load which makes mirrors impractical devices for reflecting to the operator a view of the highway to the rear, a following escort vehicle equipped with proper mirrors meeting the requirements herein may be substituted for the required mirrors on the hauling motor vehicle. The escort vehicle must be a car or light truck and it must be equipped with an oversize load sign, flashing or rotating lights, and a two (2) way radio which provides full-time communication with the escorted vehicle.

§ 49-941, 49-942. [Reserved.]

§ 49-943. Windshields to be unobstructed and equipped with wipers.

No person shall drive any motor vehicle with any sign, poster, or other nontransparent material upon the front windshield, side wings, or side or rear windows of the vehicle which obstructs the driver’s clear view of the highway or any intersecting highway.

The windshield on every motor vehicle shall be equipped with a device for cleaning rain, snow, or other moisture from the windshield, which device shall be constructed as to be controlled or operated by the driver of the vehicle.

Every windshield wiper upon a motor vehicle shall be maintained in good working order.

§ 49-944. Standards for windshields and windows of motor vehicles — Prohibited acts — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to place, install, affix or apply any window tinting film or sunscreening device to the windows of any motor vehicle, except as follows:

Nonreflective window tinting film or sunscreening devices shall not be applied to the windshield below the AS-1 line; if no AS-1 line is identifiable on the windshield, nonreflective window tinting film or sunscreening devices shall not be applied to the windshield below a line extending six (6) inches below and parallel to the exposed windshield;

Nonreflective window tinting film or sunscreening devices that have a light transmission of not less than thirty-five percent (35%) with a tolerance limit of plus or minus three percent (3%) and a luminous reflectance of no more than thirty-five percent (35%) with a tolerance limit of plus or minus three percent (3%) may be applied to the front side vents, front side windows to the immediate right and left of the driver, and the rear window;

Nonreflective window tinting film or sunscreening devices that have a light transmission of not less than twenty percent (20%) with a tolerance limit of plus or minus three percent (3%) and a luminous reflectance of no more than thirty-five percent (35%) with a tolerance limit of plus or minus three percent (3%) may be applied to the side windows to the rear of the driver;

Window tinting films or sunscreening devices are materials or devices which are designed to be used in conjunction with approved vehicle glazing materials for the purpose of reducing the effects of the sun;

Light transmission is the ratio of the amount of total light, expressed in percentages, which is allowed to pass through the product or material to the amount of total light falling on the product or material;

Luminous reflectance is the ratio of the amount of total light, expressed in percentages, which is reflected outward by the product or material to the amount of total light falling on the product or material.

No person shall operate on the public highways, sell, or offer to sell any motor vehicle with a windshield or windows which are not in compliance with the provisions of this section.

Persons who own a motor vehicle with a windshield or windows not in compliance with the provisions of this section on June 30, 1992, shall not be charged with a violation of the provisions of this section until January 1, 1993. Persons owning a motor vehicle with a windshield or windows not in compliance with the provisions of this section on June 30, 1992, shall have until January 1, 1993, to obtain a certificate from the Idaho state police indicating that the person owned the motor vehicle containing a windshield or windows not in compliance with the provisions of this section on or before June 30, 1992. The certificate shall be carried in the vehicle. A person operating a motor vehicle with a valid certificate as provided in this subsection shall not be deemed to be violating the provisions of this section on or after January 1, 1993. The Idaho state police may promulgate rules in order to implement the provisions of this section.

Nonreflective window tinting film or sunscreening devices that have a light transmission of not less than seventy percent (70%) plus or minus three percent (3%) for the front windshield and not less than twenty percent (20%) plus or minus three percent (3%) for the windows, with a luminous reflectance of no more than thirty-five percent (35%) plus or minus three percent (3%) in each instance, is permitted for a motor vehicle operated by, or carrying as a passenger, a person who possesses written verification from a licensed physician that the operator or passenger must be protected from exposure to sunlight or heat for medical reasons associated with past or current treatment; such written verification shall be carried in the vehicle.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to make illegal the operation or sale of any motor vehicle, the windshield or windows of which are composed of, covered by, or treated with, any material, substance, system, or component with which the motor vehicle was sold when new or could have been equipped for sale when new as standard or optional equipment from the manufacturer or authorized dealer under any United States government statute or regulation governing such sale at the time of manufacture.

Any person convicted of a violation of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of an infraction.

§ 49-945. Safety glazing material in motor vehicles.

No person shall sell any new motor vehicle, nor shall any new motor vehicle be registered unless the vehicle is equipped with safety glazing material of a type approved by the director wherever glazing material is used in doors, windows, and windshields. This provision shall apply to all passenger-type motor vehicles, including passenger buses and school buses, but in respect to trucks, including truck tractors, the requirements as to safety glazing material shall apply to all glazing material used in doors, windows, and windshields in the drivers’ compartments of the vehicles.

§ 49-946, 49-947. [Reserved.]

Every solid rubber tire on a vehicle shall have rubber on its entire traction surface at least one (1) inch thick above the edge of the flange of the entire periphery.

No person shall operate or move on any highway any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer having any metal tire in contact with the highway.

No tire on a vehicle moved on a highway shall have on its periphery any block, stud, flange, cleat, spike, or any other protuberance of any material other than rubber which projects beyond the tread of the traction surface of the tire, except as allowed herein. It shall be permissible to use farm machinery with tires having protuberances which will not injure the highway, and it shall be permissible to use tire chains. Tires with built-in lugs of tungsten carbide or other suitable material, hereinafter called studs, may be used upon any vehicle when required for safety because of snow, ice, or other conditions tending to cause a vehicle to skid, that will not unduly damage the highway. Motor vehicles, trailers and semitrailers with tires having built-in studs are prohibited on public highways between the dates of May 1 and September 30, annually, except as provided in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection:

Fire pumper/tanker trucks and ladder trucks belonging to fire departments and firefighting agencies are exempt from the prohibited dates.

A vehicle may be equipped year-round with tires that have retractable studs if the studs retract pneumatically or mechanically to at or below the wear bar of the tire when not in use and the retractable studs protrude beyond the wear bar of the tire only between October 1 and April 30. Retractable studs may be made of metal or other material and are not subject to the stud weight requirements of subsection (4) of this section.

Special exemptions from the prohibited dates may be granted by the Idaho transportation board if it is found by the board that enhancements to public safety outweigh the increased pavement wear.

Commercial tire retailers shall not sell studded tires with studs exceeding the following weight and protrusion limitations after July 1, 2005. Commercial tire retailers and tire shops shall not manually install studs exceeding the following weight and protrusion limitations after July 1, 2005.

Studs shall not protrude more than six-hundredths (.06) of an inch from the surface of the tire tread when originally installed.

Stud size shall be as recommended by the manufacturer of the tire for the type and size of the tire.

Studs shall individually weigh no more than one and one-half (1.5) grams if the stud is size 14 or less.

Studs shall individually weigh no more than two and three-tenths (2.3) grams if the stud size is 15 or 16.

Studs shall individually weigh no more than three (3) grams if the stud size is 17 or larger.
(5) If the Idaho transportation department determines, at any time, that Lookout Pass or Fourth of July Pass on interstate 90 or Lolo Pass on state highway 12 is of an unsafe condition so as to require chains, as defined in section 49-104, Idaho Code, in addition to pneumatic tires, the Idaho transportation department may establish requirements for the use of chains on all commercial vehicles as defined in section 49-123(2)(d)(i) and (ii), Idaho Code, traveling on interstate 90 or state highway 12. If the Idaho transportation department establishes that chains are so required, the Idaho transportation department shall:

Motor vehicles employed solely in transporting school children and teachers to or from school or to or from approved school activities, when the motor vehicle is either:

Wholly owned and operated by such school; or

Leased or contracted by such school and the motor vehicle is not used in furtherance of any other commercial enterprise;

(a) Provide multiple advance notices of the chain requirement;

(b) Provide adequate opportunities for pull out;

(c) Provide notification at a point at which the commercial vehicle can safely pull out of the normal flow of traffic, prior to the point at which chains are required; and

(d) In no case post requirements for chains on bare pavement.

(6) Provided that the conditions in subsection (5) of this section are met, the chain requirement shall be met by chaining a minimum of one (1) tire on each side of:

(a) One (1) drive axle, regardless of the number of drive axles; and

(b) One (1) axle at or near the rear of each towed vehicle. Such axle shall not include a variable load suspension axle or an axle of a converter dolly.

(7) Chains as required in subsection (6)(a) and (b) of this section mean “chains” as defined in section 49-104, Idaho Code. Any other traction device differing from chains in construction, material or design but capable of providing traction equal to or exceeding that of chains under similar conditions may be used.

(8) The Idaho transportation department shall place and maintain signs and other traffic control devices on the interstate and state highway passes as designated in subsection (5) of this section that indicate the chain requirements under subsection (6) of this section.

(9) Exempt from the chaining requirements provided for in subsections (5) and (6) of this section are:

(a) Motor vehicles operated by the Idaho transportation department when used in the maintenance of the interstate or state highway system; and

(b) The following:

§ 49-949. Requirement as to fender or covers over all wheels on motor vehicles.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate or move or any owner to permit to be operated or moved, any motor vehicle, truck, bus, semitrailer or trailer, upon any highway without having the vehicle equipped with fenders or covers which may include flaps or splash aprons, over and to the rear of wheels, as follows:

On the rear wheels of every truck equipped with a body, bus, trailer or semitrailer the fenders or covers shall extend in full width from a point above and forward of the center of the tires over and to the rear of the wheels to a point that is not more than ten (10) inches above the surface of the highway when the vehicle is empty;

Behind the rear wheels of every truck not equipped with a body the fenders or covers shall extend downward in full width from a point not lower than halfway between the center of the wheels and the top of the tires on the wheels to a point that is not more than ten (10) inches above the surface of the highway when the vehicle is empty;

Behind all wheels of every motor vehicle other than trucks, buses, semitrailers, or trailers, the fenders or covers shall extend in full width from a point above and forward of the center of the tire over and to the rear of the wheel to a point that is not more than twenty (20) inches above the surface of the highway, unless the bumper is a factory built bumper fastened directly to the frame of the vehicle pursuant to factory installation requirements;

Fenders or covers are not required on any modified American-made pre-1935 vehicle, or any identifiable vintage or replica thereof that is titled as a later assembled vehicle or replica and is used for show and pleasure use when such vehicle is used and driven only during fair weather on well-maintained hard-surfaced roads.

Fenders or covers, as used in subsection (1) of this section, shall be deemed to be of sufficient size and construction as to comply with those requirements if constructed as follows:

When measured on the cross sections of the tread of the wheel or on the combined cross sections of the treads of multiple wheels, the fender or cover extends at least to each side of the width of the tire or of the combined width of the multiple tires, as the case may be;

The fender or cover is constructed as to be capable at all times of arresting and deflecting dirt, mud, water, or other substance as may be picked up and carried by wheels;

For school buses if the body extension behind the rear wheels exceeds five (5) feet.

§ 49-950, 49-951. [Reserved.]

No person shall operate any truck, bus, or truck tractor upon any highway outside the corporate limits of municipalities at any time specified in section 49-903, Idaho Code, unless there shall be carried in the vehicle the following equipment, except as provided in subsection (2):

At least three (3) flares, or three (3) red electric lanterns, or three (3) portable red emergency reflectors, each of which shall be capable of being seen and distinguished at a distance of not less than six hundred (600) feet under normal atmospheric conditions at nighttime.

At least two (2) red-cloth flags, not less than twelve (12) inches square, with standards to support the flags.

No flare, fusee, electric lantern or cloth warning flag shall be used for the purpose of compliance with the requirements of this section unless the equipment is of a type which has been submitted to the board and approved by it. No portable reflector unit shall be used for the purpose of compliance with the requirements of this section unless it is designed and constructed to include two (2) reflecting elements one above the other, each of which shall be capable of reflecting red light clearly visible from all distances within six hundred (600) feet to one hundred (100) feet under normal atmospheric conditions at night when directly in front of lawful upper beams of head lamps, and unless it is of a type which has been submitted to the board and approved by it.

No person shall operate at the time and under conditions stated in subsection (1) any motor vehicle used in the transportation of explosives, any cargo tank truck used for the transportation of flammable liquids or compressed gases, or any motor vehicle using a compressed gas as a fuel unless there shall be carried in the vehicle three (3) red electric lanterns or three (3) portable red emergency reflectors meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, and there shall not be carried in any compressed gas propelled vehicle any flares, fusees, or signal produced by flame.

§ 49-953. Display of warning devices when vehicle disabled.

Whenever any truck, bus, truck tractor, trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is disabled upon the traveled portion or the shoulder of any highway outside of any municipality at any time when lighted lamps are required on vehicles, the driver of the vehicle shall display the following warning devices upon the highway during the time the vehicle is disabled on the highway except as provided in subsection (2):

A lighted fusee, a lighted red electric lantern or a portable red emergency reflector shall be immediately placed at the traffic side of the motor vehicle in the direction of the nearest approaching traffic.

As soon thereafter as possible, but in any event within the burning period of the fusee (15 minutes), the driver shall place three (3) liquid-burning flares (pot torches), or three (3) lighted red electric lanterns, or three (3) portable red emergency reflectors on the traveled portion of the highway in the following order:

One, approximately two hundred (200) feet from the disabled vehicle in the center of the lane occupied by the vehicle and toward traffic approaching in that lane.

One, approximately two hundred (200) feet in the opposite direction from the disabled vehicle and in the center of the traffic lane occupied by the vehicle.

One at the traffic side of the disabled vehicle not less than ten (10) feet rearward or forward in the direction of the nearest approaching traffic. If a lighted red electric lantern or a red portable emergency reflector has been placed at the traffic side of the vehicle in accordance with paragraph 1. of this subsection, it may be used for this purpose.

Whenever any vehicle referred to in this section is disabled within five hundred (500) feet of a curve, hill crest, or other obstruction to view, the warning signal in that direction shall be placed to afford ample warning to other users of the highway, but in no case less than five hundred (500) feet from the disabled vehicle.

Whenever any vehicle of a type referred to in this section is disabled upon any portion of a divided highway during the time that lights are required, the appropriate warning devices prescribed in subsections (1) and (5) of this section shall be placed one (1) at a distance of approximately two hundred (200) feet from the vehicle in the center of the lane occupied by the stopped vehicle and in the direction of traffic approaching in that lane; one (1) at a distance of approximately one hundred (100) feet from the vehicle, in the center of the lane occupied by the vehicle and in the direction of traffic approaching in that lane; and one (1) at the traffic side of the vehicle and approximately ten (10) feet from the vehicle in the direction of the nearest approaching traffic.

Whenever any vehicle of a type referred to in this section is disabled upon the traveled portion or the shoulder of a highway outside any municipality at any time when the display of fusees, flares, red electric lanterns or portable red emergency reflectors is not required, the driver of the vehicle shall display two (2) red flags upon the highway in the lane of traffic occupied by the disabled vehicle, one (1) at a distance of approximately two hundred (200) feet in advance of the vehicle, and one (1) at a distance of approximately two hundred (200) feet to the rear of the vehicle.
(5) Whenever any motor vehicle used in the transportation of explosives or any cargo tank truck used for the transportation of any flammable liquid or compressed flammable gas, or any motor vehicle using compressed gas as a fuel, is disabled upon a highway at any time or place mentioned in subsection (1) of this section, the driver of the vehicle shall immediately display one (1) red electric lantern or portable red emergency reflector placed on the highway at the traffic side of the vehicle, and two (2) red electric lanterns or portable red reflectors, one (1) placed approximately two hundred (200) feet to the front and one (1) placed approximately two hundred (200) feet to the rear of the disabled vehicle in the center of the traffic lane occupied by the vehicle. Flares, fusees, or signals produced by flame shall not be used as warning devices for disabled vehicles of the type mentioned in this subsection.

(6) Flares, fusees, red electric lanterns, portable red emergency reflectors, and flags to be displayed as required in this section shall conform with the requirements of section 49-952, Idaho Code.

§ 49-954, 49-955. [Reserved.]

Every motor vehicle when operated upon a highway shall be equipped with a horn in good working order and capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than two hundred (200) feet, but no horn or other warning device shall emit an unreasonably loud or harsh sound or whistle. The driver of a motor vehicle shall when reasonably necessary to insure safe operation give audible warning with his horn, but shall not otherwise use the horn when upon a highway.

No vehicle shall be equipped with nor shall any person use upon a vehicle any siren, whistle, or bell, except as otherwise permitted in this section.

It is permissible, but not required for any vehicle to be equipped with a theft alarm signal device, so arranged that it cannot be used by the driver as an ordinary warning signal.

Any authorized emergency vehicle may be equipped with a siren, whistle, or bell, capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet and of a type approved by the director, but the siren shall not be used except when the vehicle is operated in response to an emergency call or in the immediate pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, in which the latter events the driver of the vehicle shall sound the siren when reasonably necessary to warn pedestrians and other drivers of the approach.

§ 49-957, 49-958. [Reserved.]

Air-conditioning equipment shall be manufactured, installed and maintained with due regard for the safety of the occupants of the vehicle and the public and shall not contain any refrigerant which is toxic to persons or which is flammable at or below one thousand degrees (1000°) Fahrenheit, unless the refrigerant is included in the list published by the United States environmental protection agency as an approved alternative motor vehicle air-conditioning substitute for chlorofluorocarbon-12 under 42 U.S.C. section 7671k(c).

No person shall have for sale, offer for sale, sell or equip any motor vehicle with any air-conditioning equipment unless it complies with the requirements of this section.

No person shall operate on any highway any motor vehicle equipped with any air-conditioning equipment unless the equipment complies with the requirements of this section.

§ 49-960, 49-961. [Reserved.]

It shall be unlawful for the operator of any motorcycle or motor driven cycle to carry a passenger on the vehicle unless it is equipped with footrests designed exclusively for the use of a passenger on the vehicle.

§ 49-963, 49-964. [Reserved.]

It shall be unlawful to operate any passenger motor vehicle which has been modified from the original design so that any portion of the vehicle other than the wheels has less clearance from the surface of a level highway than the clearance between the highway and the lowermost portion of any rim of any wheel in contact with the highway.

§ 49-966. Motor vehicle bumper height requirements.

With the exception of motor vehicles registered pursuant to section 49-406, 49-406A, 49-407 or 49-408, Idaho Code, or motor vehicles where the original or predominant body configuration of the motor vehicle, provided by a recognized manufacturer, did not include a front or rear bumper or bumpers for vehicles meeting the original specifications of a recognized manufacturer, a motor vehicle shall be equipped with a bumper on both the front and rear of the vehicle.

Bumpers, unless specifically exempt in subsection (1) of this section, shall be at least four and one-half (4 ½) inches in vertical height centered on the vehicle’s centerline by bolting or welding to the vehicle frame as originally installed by the vehicle manufacturer. Bumpers shall be horizontal load bearing and attach to the vehicle to effectively transfer energy when impacted and shall extend in width to the originally manufactured tread width for the vehicle.

The maximum bumper heights for a vehicle shall be determined by vehicle class and the vehicle’s gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR). Maximum bumper height is the vertical distance between the ground and the highest point on the bottom of the bumper and shall be measured when the vehicle is laden on a level surface with the vehicle’s tires inflated to the manufacturer’s recommended pressure. For vehicles exempted from the bumper requirements for reasons stated in subsection (1) of this section, a maximum frame elevation measurement shall be made to the bottom of the frame rail. Maximum heights are as follows:

Vehicles which do not meet the requirements of this section on July 1, 1997, must be brought into compliance by July 1, 1998.

Passenger Cars

22 inches

22 inches

Trucks and MPVs

4,500 or less lbs. GVWR

24 inches

26 inches

4,501 to 7,500 lbs. GVWR

27 inches

29 inches

7,501 to 10,000 lbs. GVWR

28 inches

30 inches

Four-wheel drive or dual wheel

with a 10,000 or less lbs. GVWR

30 inches

31 inches

§ 49-967. Air bags and air bag systems — Disclosure if inoperable.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell or otherwise transfer ownership of a vehicle without giving prior written notice to the purchaser or transferee if the person knows or should reasonably know that any air bag or the air bag system is inoperable.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to vehicles originally equipped with factory-installed air bags or an air bag system.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a vehicle in which a deployed air bag is visible in its deployed condition or to a vehicle from which an air bag has been cut or torn away and that fact is plainly visible.

§ 49-933. Brakes.

§ 49-937. Mufflers, prevention of noise.

§ 49-948. Restrictions as to tire equipment.

§ 49-952. Certain vehicles to carry flares or other warning devices.

§ 49-956. Horns and warning devices.

§ 49-959. Air-conditioning equipment.

§ 49-962. Footrests on motorcycles and motor driven cycles.

§ 49-965. Modification of vehicle to reduce road clearance beyond certain limits unlawful.